Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202524-810.01
Judicial nominating commission; change in residency or party registration; effect.

A change in residency that results in a member not satisfying the residency requirements of section 24-802 or a change in party registration shall automatically terminate the tenure of any member of a judicial nominating commission.

Laws 1973, LB 110, § 7;

Laws 1991, LB 251, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB388, § 8.